incubator/apertium-cy-kw.kw.dix
    <pardef n="br/oder__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eder</l>
          <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oder</l>
          <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tav/as__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>osow</l>
          <r>as<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="medh/ek__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ek</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ygyon</l>
          <r>ek<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="conyn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pendr/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evow</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cam__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mow</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bat__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tys</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="padel__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>low</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="b/ysow__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esewow</l>
          <r>ysow<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ysow</l>
          <r>ysow<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="tavas"><par n="initial-t"/><i>av</i><par n="tav/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cam"><i>cam</i><par n="cam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="conyn"><i>conyn</i><par n="conyn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="poket"><par n="initial-p"/><i>oket</i><par n="bat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="padel"><par n="initial-p"/><i>adel</i><par n="padel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bat"><par n="initial-b"/><i>at</i><par n="bat__n"/></e>
    <e lm="medhek"><par n="initial-m"/><i>edh</i><par n="medh/ek__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bysow"><par n="initial-b"/><i></i><par n="b/ysow__n"/></e>
